Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.450

Low-cost housing—Legislative finding.

The legislature finds there is a shortage of adequate housing in a suitable environment in many parts of this state for people of modest means, which shortage adversely affects the public in general and the mutual savings banks of this state and their depositors. The legislature further finds that the making of loans or investments to alleviate this problem which may provide a less than market rate of return and entail a higher degree of risk than might otherwise be acceptable, will benefit this state, the banks, and their depositors.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 31 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 31: See RCW 32.20.500.